Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-522. Applicability of benefit provisions.

The benefit provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to specified members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to each person who has never been a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System before January 1, 1978, and who is employed on or after January 1, 1978, in a position covered by the system and who thereby becomes a member.

In addition, each other member who was actively employed in a position covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on June 30, 1991, may elect to become covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter by application written to, and received by, the governing body of the plan before January 1, 1985.

Each other member who was not actively employed in a position covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on January 1, 1978, shall become covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter at the time the member first becomes so employed after January 1, 1978, unless he or she elects to become covered by the provisions of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System which require member contributions, by election written to, and received by, the governing body of the system before the later of January 1, 1986, and six (6) months after the member first becomes so employed after January 1, 1978.

However, if the member so elects benefits requiring member contributions, he or she shall pay the member contributions from the date of the employment, together with regular interest, from the dates the contributions would normally have been received by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to the dates of actual payment.

The benefits of each member's becoming covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter shall be computed by applying the benefit provisions prescribed by this chapter for all credited service of the person rendered before and after January 1, 1978.

However, benefit amounts based upon employment before January 1, 1978, shall not be less than benefit amounts computed in accordance with the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System benefit provisions at the time of retirement which require member contributions.

The noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter, including death and disability benefits, shall apply to all credited service rendered before or after the date of election of employees of the Department of Human Services in either the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Employees of the Department of Human Services and employees of Arkansas Rehabilitation Services shall be entitled to the benefit amount computed by applying the benefit provisions prescribed by this chapter for all credited service rendered before and after January 1, 1978, except that benefit amounts based upon employment before January 1, 1978, shall not be less than benefit amounts computed in accordance with benefit provisions in effect December 31, 1977.

On and after January 1, 1993, employees of Arkansas Rehabilitation Services who elected to be covered by the provisions of this subsection and who are still active employees on January 1, 1993, shall be entitled to the benefit amount computed by applying the benefit provisions prescribed by this chapter for all credited service rendered before and after January 1, 1978, except that benefit amounts based upon employment before January 1, 1978, shall be computed in accordance with current benefit provisions in effect for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System at the time of their retirement.

In computing the benefit under the benefit provisions of this chapter, the final average compensation shall be computed upon all service before and after the election of the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services employee as provided in § 24-4-101(33) and § 24-4-746.

Each public retirement system in which the employee has served shall be responsible financially for the benefit amounts payable to the retirant, the retirant's survivors, and the retirant's beneficiaries based upon the ratio of the number of years the employee was a member of that public retirement system to the total number of years the employee was a member of any of the two (2) statewide retirement systems, i.e., the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The benefit provisions of this chapter shall be administered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for the benefit of all employees making the option.

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall certify monthly the amount of benefits paid hereunder, and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall immediately transfer that amount from its benefit account to the proper account designated by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

If an employee of the Department of Human Services who becomes or has become a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System under the provisions of this section leaves employment with the Department of Human Services and becomes employed in another position covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the person's credited service, both before and after his or her service under this chapter, shall be subject to the benefit provisions of §§ 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, and 24-7-716 [repealed].

The member shall be eligible to establish reciprocity under the provisions of §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405 and 24-2-407.

Members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System who have not elected to pay contributions to that system on full salary shall not be eligible to elect to become covered by the benefit provisions of this chapter unless they first make written application with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System for full salary coverage for all salaries received from July 1, 1969, until the date of making the election to come under the provisions of this chapter and paying to the system the amount of the additional contributions, plus regular interest, for full salary credited service.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System employed prior to January 1, 1978, who does not elect in writing to become covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter shall not be covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter but shall remain in the plan he or she was in January 1, 1978, and shall continue to make regular contributions as provided in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who elects in writing to become covered by the noncontributory benefit provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to a refund of any accumulated contributions paid on or after January 1, 1978, and prior to the date of election.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 30; 2019, No. 910, § 2367.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Career Education” following “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the” in (c)(2)(A) and (B).

24-4-523. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning conversion from contributory to noncontributory plan and extension of time, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 332, § 10. This section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 151, § 30.

Subchapter 6
— Benefits

Effective Dates.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 17: Mar. 7, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a State Employees Retirement System is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled state employees and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that the Board of Trustees herein created be appointed, organize and establish the necessary rules and forms to be followed upon the establishment of the retirement system herein created on July 1, 1957. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 42, § 16: Feb. 13, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of county employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled county employees; that the coverage is best obtained by including the county employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that it is necessary for the Board of Trustees of said Arkansas State Employees Retirement System to organize and establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of county employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 11, §§ 2, 3: Retroactive to Jan. 1, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that clarification of the State Employees Retirement Act is needed and because of the lack of clarification such act is now depriving certain members of retirement benefits and that only by the immediate passage of this Act can such situations be clarified. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 64, § 9: Feb. 8, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined by the General Assembly that the coverage of municipal employees in a retirement system is necessary in order to retain and recruit efficient and skilled municipal employees; that the coverage is best obtained by permitting the inclusion of municipal employees in the membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System, established by Act 177 of 1957, as amended; that the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall establish necessary rules, regulations and forms to effectuate said coverage of municipal employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1965, No. 153, § 15: Mar. 9, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “This act shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 632, § 7: May 27, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 185 of 1969 which provides for an increase in contributions to and benefits payable under the State Employees Retirement System to be effective on July 1, 1969 did not contain an emergency clause and therefore will not be effective until ninety (90) days after adjournment of the Regular Session; that due to the extension of the Regular Session as authorized in the Constitution, acts not having an emergency clause will not be effective until well after July 1; and that it is essential to the proper administration of the State Employees Retirement System that the increase in contributions to and benefits payable under the State Employees Retirement System take effect on July 1, 1969. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 586, § 11: Apr. 3, 1986. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act clarify coverage, service, credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 666, § 14: Apr. 10, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act change the rate of contributions, change the value of service credits and establish new types of benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and, in order to enable persons to receive proper benefits thereunder without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 907, § 22: Apr. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 663, § 8: Mar. 23, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this Act clarify coverage, service credits, and eligibility for benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System; and in order to enable those persons who are eligible for such coverage, service credits, or benefits thereunder to obtain such without undue delay, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of this Act is essential. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 715, § 9: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Public Retirement laws need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the systems and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 859, § 19: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, need further clarification in order for their meaning to be comprehensible to members of the system and administrators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 637, § 4: Mar. 22, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current law regarding death-in-service benefits has not provided for benefits in the case of otherwise eligible persons who are forced to leave the payroll of a participating employer solely due to illness or accident which results in death and that this Act is immediately necessary to correct this inequity. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 865, § 4: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Public Employees Retirement System laws need to be amended to provide an increase of up to ten percent (10%) for those members and beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1982. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 552, § 3: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Public Employees Retirement System laws need to be amended to provide an increase of up to ten percent (10%) for those members and beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1984. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1991, No. 223, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that benefits provided to members of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to provide adequate benefits. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 380, § 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, the Arkansas State Police Retirement System and the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 432, § 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and the Arkansas State Police Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 938, § 5: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System are inadequate, and an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 629, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that retirement benefits provided to members of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System are inadequate; that the benefits should be increased as soon as possible in order to provide adequate benefits, and that effective fiscal administration of the System will be aided by implementing those increases as the state's fiscal year begins. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration in State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 630, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that retirement benefits payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System are inadequate; that the retirant and beneficiary payments should be increased as soon as possible in order to relieve this inequity, and that effective fiscal administration of the System will be aided by implementing those increases at the same time as the state's fiscal year begins. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration in State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 318, § 7: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that retirement benefits payable to current and future retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System are inadequate; that the current and future retirant and beneficiary payments should be increased as soon as possible in order to relieve this inequity; and that effective fiscal administration of the System will be aided by implementing those increases at the same time as the State's fiscal year begins. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration in State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 39, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that historically the Public Employees Retirement System has recomputed retirement benefits on July 1 of each year to reflect a cost of living increase; that this act modifies the cost of living increase; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect on July 1 of this year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not be effective until July 1 of the succeeding year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 17: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility, death benefits, and disability benefits, and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 496, § 9: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that retirement benefits payable to current and future retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System are inadequate; that the current and future retirant and beneficiary payments should be increased as soon as possible in order to relieve this inequity, and that the effective fiscal administration of the System will be aided by implementing those increases at the same time as the state's fiscal year begins. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration in State government, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1450, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility for death benefits and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 355, § 4: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 356, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 357, § 3: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 438, § 5: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System this act should become effective on July 1, 2001. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 383, § [2]: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005,
No. 1450, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 1568, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the distribution of benefits to retirees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and that the ideal time to make revisions to the system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 1200, § 3: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this country is in a recession, that Arkansas retirants have been hurt economically by the recession, that this act will increase benefits for those retirants that served the state the longest period of time, that the fiscal year of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System begins on July 1 of each year, and that these changes are needed by July 1, 2009, in order to have a smooth transition between fiscal years. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 625, § 4, provided: “Retroactivity. This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2017”.

24-4-601. Straight life annuity generally.

Beginning July 1, 2001, any member who retires as provided in § 24-4-508 or §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 shall receive a straight life annuity for each year of contributory service credit equal to two and seven-hundredths percent (2.07%) of the member's final average compensation multiplied by the number of years and fraction of a year of credited service rendered on or after July 1, 2001, with the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Beginning July 1, 2001, any member who retires as provided in § 24-4-508 or §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 shall receive a straight life annuity for each year of contributory service credit equal to two and eleven-hundredths percent (2.11%) of the member's average compensation multiplied by the number of years and fraction of a year of credited service rendered before July 1, 2001, with the system.

For each year of noncontributory credited service in the system rendered prior to July 1, 2007, resulting from employment in a position covered at any time by Social Security or another federal retirement plan supported wholly or in part by employer contributions, a member shall receive one and seventy-five-hundredths percent (1.75%) of the member's final average compensation plus, for each year of noncontributory credited service in the system rendered prior to July 1, 2007, resulting from employment in a position never so covered, a member shall receive two and eleven-hundredths percent (2.11%) of the member's final average compensation.

For each year of credited service in the system rendered after June 30, 2007, resulting from employment in a position covered at any time by Social Security or another federal retirement plan supported wholly or in part by employer contributions, a member shall receive one and seventy-two-hundredths percent (1.72%) of the member's final average compensation plus, for each year of credited service in the system rendered after June 30, 2007, resulting from employment in a position never so covered, a member shall receive two and seven-hundredths percent (2.07%) of the member's final average compensation. In no event shall service as a district judge in the state division receive less than three percent (3%) of the member's final average compensation.

For each year of actual service in the system in excess of twenty-eight (28) years that is rendered on or after July 1, 2009, a member shall receive a straight life annuity equal to an additional five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) of the member's final average compensation.

A member of the General Assembly first elected before July 1, 1999, shall receive a monthly annuity equal to thirty-five dollars ($35.00) multiplied by the number of years of actual service as a member of the General Assembly.

A member of the General Assembly first elected before July 1, 1999, who served as Speaker of the House of Representatives or President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall receive a monthly annuity equal to forty dollars ($40.00) multiplied by the total number of years of actual service as a member of the General Assembly.

In addition, if a member has credited service resulting from employment in a position covered at any time by Social Security or another federal retirement plan supported wholly or in part by employer contributions, and if that member is retiring as provided in subsection (b) of this section or § 24-4-510, and if that member's age at retirement is younger than Social Security's minimum age for an immediate retirement benefit and age sixty-two (62), then that member of the system shall receive a temporary annuity equal to thirty-three-hundredths of one percent (0.33%) of his or her final average compensation for each year of the noncontributory credited service.

The temporary annuity shall terminate at the end of the calendar month in which the earliest of the following events occurs:

The member's death;

The member's attainment of the Social Security minimum age; or

The member's attainment of age sixty-two (62).

It is considered sound public policy that retirement pay not exceed working pay except for increases after retirement caused by inflation. Accordingly, at the time of retirement the total of the system's noncontributory annuities resulting from employment in a position also covered by Social Security shall not exceed the member's final average compensation.

If no temporary annuity is payable as provided in this subsection or after the temporary annuity has terminated and if the member has at retirement any credited service for any period of time prior to July 1, 1991, then the future payments of the annuity for life shall not be less than they would have been under the provisions that were in effect on July 1, 1990, for this subsection, plus a corresponding increase for any benefit enhancements that have been enacted since July 1, 1991.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 11; 1959, No. 42, § 11; 1965, No. 153, §§ 11, 12; 1967, No. 108, § 3; 1969, No. 632, § 3; 1975, No. 907, § 9; 1979, No. 715, § 6; 1981, No. 859, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511; Acts 1991, No. 223, § 1; 1995, No. 629, § 1; 1997, No. 318, § 1; 1999, No. 496, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 31; 2001, No. 355, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 55; 2005, No. 1450, § 1; 2007, No. 220, § 1; 2009, No. 1200 §
1; 2011, No. 38, § 8.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted, the 1991 amendment in (a) began “Beginning July 1, 1991”.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b)(3).

The 2011 amendment added the last sentence in (b)(2).

24-4-602. Payment of annuity balance upon death of retirant or member.

In the event a retirant who is in receipt of a straight life annuity dies before he or she has received in straight life annuity payments an aggregate amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her retirement, the difference between his or her accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of straight life annuity payments received by him or her shall be paid to such persons as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

If there is no designated person surviving the retirant, the difference, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the Arkansas laws of descent and distribution.

The payments may be made directly to a curator or guardian, or to an administrator or an executor, authorized to receive the payments, wherever the representative may be, with or without the appointment of a representative in this state.

In the event a member dies and does not leave a beneficiary entitled to an annuity payable from funds of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account as of the time of his or her death shall be paid pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 11; 1959, No. 42, § 11; 1961, No. 11, § 1; 1961, No. 64, § 5; 1965, No. 153, §§ 11, 12; 1967, No. 108, §§ 3, 4; 1967, No. 175, § 2; 1969, No. 81, § 1; 1969, No. 381, § 1; 1969, No. 632, §§ 3, 4; 1973, No. 586, §§ 5, 6; 1975, No. 907, §§ 1, 2, 9; 1977, No. 109, § 1; 1977, No. 816, § 1; 1979, No. 387, § 1; 1979, No. 715, §§ 2, 6; 1981, No. 859, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.